Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.050

Objections to granting of nonintervention powers—Restrictions.

(1) If at the time set for the hearing upon a petition for nonintervention powers, any person entitled to notice of the hearing on the petition under RCW 11.68.041 shall appear and object to the granting of nonintervention powers to the personal representative of the estate, the court shall consider the objections, if any, in connection with its determination under RCW 11.68.011(2)(c) of whether a grant of nonintervention powers would be in the best interests of the decedent's beneficiaries.

(2) The nonintervention powers of a personal representative may not be restricted at a hearing on a petition for nonintervention powers in which the court is required to grant nonintervention powers under RCW 11.68.011(2) (a) and (b), unless a will specifies that the nonintervention powers of a personal representative may be restricted when the powers are initially granted.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4005; 1997 c 252 s 62; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 21; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 17.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.